Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 45-1201 to 45-1211 shall be known and
may be cited as the Nebraska Construction Prompt Pay Act.

Laws 2010, LB552, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB961, § 4.